Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1111.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 202. (1) An application applicant for licensure or registration under this act shall be made submit an application on a form provided by the department that contains the applicant's full legal name and accompanied by pay the appropriate fees prescribed described in article 4. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the department shall issue a license or registration under a specific article of this act to a person who that meets the licensure licensing or registration requirements set forth described in a that specific article and in rules promulgated under this act, subject to the exceptions set forth in any limitations imposed on that license or registration under section 203. (2) The department shall establish the expiration date of a license or registration issued under this act shall be established by rule promulgated by the department under section 205. , which A rule shall promulgated under this section must not permit the issuance of a permanent license or registration.